Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-1701.02
Arrests; keeping the peace; duties.

It shall be the duty of every sheriff to apprehend, on view or warrant, and bring to the court all felons and disturbers and violators of the criminal laws of this state, to suppress all riots, affrays, and unlawful assemblies which may come to his or her knowledge, and generally to keep the peace in his or her proper city.

Laws 1929, c. 82, art. XV, § 176, p. 324;

C.S.1929, § 22-1506;

R.S.1943, (1979), § 26-1,177;

R.S.1943, (1985), § 24-5,100;

Laws 1988, LB 1030, § 13.